Washington statutes.
RCW 39.26.102

Exemption—Department of corrections.

The department of corrections shall be exempt from the following provisions of this chapter in respect to goods or services purchased or sold pursuant to the operation of correctional industries: RCW * 43.19.180, * 43.19.190, * 43.19.1901, * 43.19.1905, * 43.19.1906, * 43.19.1908, * 43.19.1911, * 43.19.1913, * 43.19.1915, 43.19.1917, 43.19.1919, 43.19.1921, and * 43.19.200.

[ 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 220; 1989 c 185 s 2; 1981 c 136 s 14. Formerly RCW 43.19.1932.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 43.19.180, 43.19.190, 43.19.1901, 43.19.1905, 43.19.1906, 43.19.1908, 43.19.1911, 43.19.1913, 43.19.1915, and 43.19.200 were repealed by 2012 c 224 s 29, effective January 1, 2013.

Effective date—Purpose—2011 1st sp.s. c 43: See notes following RCW 43.19.003.

Effective date—1981 c 136: See RCW 72.09.900.